Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Fiduciary Investment Companies

386.510.
Definitions for KRS 386.510 to 386.590.

As used in KRS

386.510

to

386.590

, the following terms shall be construed to have the meaning set forth by this section, unless a contrary meaning clearly appears from the context:

The term “trust institution” means any of the following corporations having trust powers and authorized to act in a fiduciary capacity under the laws of Kentucky: Any state bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of Kentucky and any national banking association incorporated under the laws of the United States and having its principal office in Kentucky;

The term “investment adviser” of a fiduciary investment company means (a) any trust institution which, pursuant to contract with a fiduciary investment company possessing the qualifications provided by KRS

386.510

to

386.590

, regularly furnishes advice to such investment company with respect to the desirability of investing in, purchasing or selling securities or other property or is empowered to determine what securities or other property shall be purchased or sold by such investment company, and (b) any person other than a trust institution, who, pursuant to contract with such trust institution, regularly performs substantially all of the duties undertaken by such trust institution;

The term “fiduciary investment company” means a corporation which is an investment company as defined by the Act of Congress entitled “Investment Company Act of 1940” approved August 22, 1940, as amended, and is incorporated in accordance with the “Kentucky Business Corporation Act” as to constitute a medium for the investment of funds held by trust institutions and foreign trust institutions in a fiduciary capacity, either alone or with one (1) or more cofiduciaries;

The term “supervisory agency” means (a) the comptroller of the currency of the United States with respect to any fiduciary investment company having a national banking association as an investment adviser, and (b) the commissioner of financial institutions of the Commonwealth of Kentucky with respect to any fiduciary investment company having a state bank as an investment adviser. The term shall mean the commissioner of financial institutions of the Commonwealth of Kentucky with respect to any fiduciary investment company which does not have an investment adviser; and

The term “foreign trust institution” means any state bank or trust company organized under the laws of any state other than Kentucky or any national banking association incorporated under the laws of the United States and having its principal office in some state other than Kentucky, which has trust powers and is authorized to act in a fiduciary capacity under the laws under which it was incorporated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 2; 1984, ch. 388, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 2010, ch. 24, § 1919, effective July 15, 2010.

386.520.
Formation of company — Approval — Regulations.

Four (4) or more trust institutions may cause a fiduciary investment company or companies to be organized and incorporated, but no trust institution or foreign trust institution may own an interest in more than seven (7) fiduciary investment companies. A fiduciary investment company shall not begin business except to select an investment advisor, until it is approved by the appropriate supervisory agency. A fiduciary investment company shall be subject to such regulations as its supervisory agency may from time to time prescribe.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 3.

386.530.
Incorporation.

Any such fiduciary investment company shall be incorporated under and subject to the provisions of the Kentucky Business Corporation Act. The incorporators shall be persons who are officers or directors of the trust institution or institutions causing such fiduciary investment company to be incorporated and the articles of incorporation shall set forth the names of each trust institution participating in such incorporation and the amount of stock originally subscribed for by each, together with such other facts as are required by the Kentucky Business Corporation Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 4.

386.540.
Regulation of investments.

Trust institutions and foreign trust institutions, as defined by KRS

386.510

, acting in a fiduciary capacity and for fiduciary purposes, may, if exercising due care as a prudent investor, and with the consent of any co-fiduciary, invest and reinvest funds held in such fiduciary capacity in the shares of stock of one (1) or more fiduciary investment companies, except where the will, trust indenture or other instrument under which such trust institution or foreign trust institution acts, prohibits such investment, provided the fiduciary investment company shall by its articles of incorporation issued and granted in conformity with the Kentucky Business Corporation Act have and possess the corporate powers required by KRS

386.510

to

386.590

and be subject to the limitations set forth by KRS 386.510 to

386.590

; provided, further, that no such trust institution or foreign trust institution shall invest in the stock of a fiduciary investment company on behalf of any estate, trust or fund administered by such trust institution or foreign trust institution a sum or amount which would result in such estate, trust or fund having a total investment in such stock in excess of the maximum amount or percentage that might be invested by such estate, trust or fund, under the regulations of the federal or state agency charged with supervising such trust institution or foreign trust institution, in any common trust fund having total assets equal to the total assets of the fiduciary investment company as increased by the proposed investment. No trust institution or foreign trust institution shall invest in the stock of a fiduciary investment company if, immediately after such investment and as a consequence thereof, it would own more than 25 percent of the voting securities of such fiduciary investment company which would then be outstanding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 5.

386.550.
Corporate powers — Limitations and restrictions.

Every fiduciary investment company in which a trust institution or foreign trust institution is authorized by KRS

386.510

to

386.590

to own and hold corporate stock or shares, in order to qualify for such investments, shall have such corporate powers as may be granted by the Kentucky Business Corporation Act by virtue of its incorporation under that law and shall, in addition, have the following corporate powers under its articles of incorporation and, by its articles of incorporation or its bylaws, be subject to the limitations and restrictions hereinafter set forth.

The stock of any such fiduciary investment company shall be owned and held only by trust institutions and foreign trust institutions acting as fiduciaries or co-fiduciaries but may be registered in the name of the nominee or nominees of any such institution or foreign trust institution. Such stock shall not be subject to transfer or assignment except to the trust institution or foreign trust institution on whose behalf the stock is held by any such nominee or nominees, or to a fiduciary or co-fiduciary which becomes successor to the shareholder and which is also a trust institution or foreign trust institution qualified to hold such stock.

A fiduciary investment company shall have no less than five (5) directors who need not be shareholders but shall be officers or directors of trust institutions or foreign trust institutions holding stock in such fiduciary investment company; provided, however, no one trust institution or foreign trust institution shall have more than a forty percent (40%) representation on the board of directors of any fiduciary investment company.

In acquiring, investing, reinvesting, exchanging, selling and managing its assets, every fiduciary investment company shall exercise the judgment and care under the circumstances then existing which men of prudence, discretion and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the safety of their capital. Within the foregoing limitations, a fiduciary investment company may acquire and retain every kind of investment, specifically including (but not by way of limitation) bonds, debentures and other corporate obligations, corporate stocks, preferred or common, which men of prudence, discretion and intelligence acquire or retain for their own account; provided, a fiduciary investment company shall not at any time:

Invest in real estate, commodities or commodity contracts, except that a fiduciary investment company may invest in securities secured by real estate or interests therein, in securities issued by companies which deal in real estate or investments therein, and in certificates of beneficial interest issued by real estate investment trusts;

Participate on a joint or joint and several basis in any securities trading account;

Invest in companies for the purpose of exercising control or management;

Make loans to any person or persons, except that the purchase of a portion of an issue of debt securities, convertible debt securities, debt securities with warrants, rights or options attached or other similar securities when originally issued or thereafter, of a character commonly distributed publicly shall not be considered the making of a loan;

Purchase or retain the securities of any issuer if immediately after such acquisition and as a result thereof the following requirements would not be met: at least seventy-five percent (75%) of the total assets in the fiduciary investment company taken at market value are represented by (i) cash and cash items, securities issued or guaranteed by the United States or any instrumentality thereof, and (ii) other securities which, as to any one (1) issuer, do not represent more than ten percent (10%) of the voting securities of such issuer or more than five percent (5%) of the value of the total assets of the fiduciary investment company;

Act as underwriter of the securities of other issuers;

Borrow money; or

Engage in margin transactions or short sales, or write, put or call options for the purchase or sale of securities.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 6; 1984, ch. 111, § 197, effective July 13, 1984.

386.560.
Purchase of own stock — Responsibility and liability — Compliance with regulations of comptroller of currency.

A fiduciary investment company may acquire, purchase or redeem its own stock and shall, by means of contract or by its bylaws, bind itself to acquire, purchase or redeem its own stock, but it shall not vote shares of its own stock theretofore redeemed.

A fiduciary investment company shall not be responsible for ascertaining the investment powers of any fiduciary who may purchase its stock and shall not be liable for accepting funds from a fiduciary in violation of restrictions of the will, trust indenture or other instrument under which such fiduciary is acting in absence of actual knowledge of such violation, and shall be accountable only to the supervisory agency and the fiduciaries who are the owners of its stock.

Every fiduciary investment company having a national bank as investment adviser shall comply with all applicable rules and regulations of the comptroller of the currency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 7.

386.570.
Control by commissioner of financial institutions.

The commissioner of financial institutions shall have authority to adopt and issue reasonable and uniform rules and regulations to govern the conduct and management of all fiduciary investment companies having investment advisers other than national banks. The commissioner of financial institutions may, whenever he may deem it necessary or expedient, examine every fiduciary investment company contemplated by KRS

386.510

to

386.590

having an investment adviser which is not a national bank. In every such examination, the commissioner of financial institutions shall make inquiry as to its financial condition, the policies of its management, whether it is complying with the laws of Kentucky, and such other matters as the commissioner of financial institutions may reasonably prescribe. In the enforcement of KRS

386.510

to

386.590

and the restrictions and limitations imposed by their articles of incorporation and bylaws, the commissioner of financial institutions shall have the same powers and authority with respect to fiduciary investment companies having investment advisers other than a national bank as are conferred upon him by the laws of this state with respect to state banks and trust companies to the same extent and in the same manner as if fiduciary investment companies were expressly named in Subtitle 3 of Chapter 286 of the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 8; 2010, ch. 24, § 1920, effective July 15, 2010.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006).
2006 Ky. Acts ch. 247 instructs the Reviser of Statutes to adjust KRS references throughout the statutes to conform with the 2006 renumbering of the Financial Services Code, KRS Chapter 286. Such an adjustment has been made in this statute.

386.580.
Advertising and publicity prohibitions — Exceptions.

Except as may be specifically authorized by rule or regulation of the appropriate supervisory agency, no trust institution or foreign trust institution holding stock in a fiduciary investment company may advertise or publicize its participation in such fiduciary investment company; provided that any trust institution or foreign trust institution holding stock in a fiduciary investment company shall furnish the annual or periodic financial reports of such fiduciary investment company, on request, to any person having a beneficial interest therein, and the fact of the availability of such material may be given publicity in connection with the promotion of the fiduciary services of such trust institution or foreign trust institution.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 9.

386.590.
Investment adviser’s contract.

No person shall serve or act as investment adviser of a fiduciary investment company except pursuant to a written contract, which contract has been approved by the vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of such fiduciary investment company and:

Precisely describes all compensation to be paid thereunder;

Shall continue in effect for a period more than two (2) years from the date of its execution, only so long as such continuance is specifically approved at least annually by the board of directors or by vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of such company;

Provides, in substance, that it may be terminated at any time, without the payment of any penalty, by the board of directors of such company or by vote of a majority of the outstanding voting securities of such company on not more than 60 days’ written notice to the investment adviser; and

Provides, in substance, for its automatic termination in the event of its assignment by the investment adviser.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 10.

386.600.
Title — Citation.

KRS

386.510

to

386.590

may be cited as the “Fiduciary Investment Company Act.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 300, § 1.

386.620.
Definitions for KRS 386.620 to 386.624.

As used in KRS

386.620

to

386.624

:

“Community property” means property owned by a community property trust during the marriage of the settlor spouses;

“Community property trust” means an express trust that complies with the requirements of KRS

386.622

;

“Decree” means a judgment or other order of a court;

“Dissolution” means either:

Termination of a marriage by a decree of dissolution, divorce, annulment, or declaration of invalidity; or

Entry of a decree of legal separation;

“During marriage” means a period that begins at marriage and ends at dissolution or the death of a spouse;

“Qualified trustee” means either:

A natural person who is a resident of this state; or

A bank or trust company authorized to act as a trustee within the state; and

“Settlor spouses” means a married couple that establishes a community property trust.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 25, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

386.622.
Arrangement between spouses involving community property considered a community property trust — Requirements for — Provisions of written agreement — Amendment or revocation of trust — Consideration not required — Classification and distribution of property.

Any arrangement between spouses involving community property shall be considered a community property trust if one (1) or both spouses transfer property to a trust that:

Expressly declares that the trust is a Kentucky community property trust that meets the requirements of KRS

386.620

to

386.624

;

Has at least one (1) trustee who is a qualified trustee whose powers include or are limited to maintaining records for the trust, on an exclusive or a nonexclusive basis, and preparing or arranging for the preparation of, on an exclusive or a nonexclusive basis, any income tax returns that must be filed by the trust. Both spouses or either spouse may be a trustee;

Is signed by both spouses; and

Contains the following language in capital letters at the beginning of the trust:

THE CONSEQUENCES OF THIS TRUST MAY BE VERY EXTENSIVE, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO YOUR RIGHTS WITH YOUR SPOUSE BOTH DURING THE COURSE OF YOUR MARRIAGE AND AT THE TIME OF A DIVORCE. ACCORDINGLY, THIS AGREEMENT SHOULD ONLY BE SIGNED AFTER CAREFUL CONSIDERATION. IF YOU HAVE ANY QUESTIONS ABOUT THIS AGREEMENT, YOU SHOULD SEEK COMPETENT ADVICE.

In the agreement establishing a community property trust, spouses may agree on and provide in writing:

The rights and obligations in the property transferred to the trust, notwithstanding when and where the property is acquired or located;

The management and control of the property transferred to the trust;

The disposition of the property transferred to the trust on dissolution, death, or the occurrence or nonoccurrence of another event;

The choice of law governing the interpretation of the trust; and

Any other matter that affects the property transferred to the trust and does not violate public policy or any statute imposing a criminal penalty.

Either spouse may amend a community property trust regarding the disposition of that spouse’s one-half (1/2) share of the community property in the event of a spouse’s death.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section, a community property trust may not be amended or revoked unless the agreement itself provides for amendment or revocation.

Whether or not both, one (1), or neither spouse is domiciled in this state, spouses may classify any or all of their property as community property by transferring property to a community property trust and providing in the trust that the property is community property.

A community property trust shall be enforceable without consideration.

All property owned by a community property trust shall be considered community property during marriage and the right to manage and control property that is transferred to a community property trust shall be determined by the terms of the trust.

When property is distributed from a community property trust, it shall no longer constitute community property.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 25, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

386.624.
Satisfaction of obligation of one or both spouses from community property trust — Distribution of assets upon death of spouse or dissolution of marriage.

An obligation incurred by only one (1) spouse before or during marriage may be satisfied from that spouse’s one-half (1/2) share of a community property trust.

An obligation incurred by both spouses during marriage may be satisfied from a community property trust of the spouses.

Upon the death of a spouse, one-half (1/2) of the aggregate value of the property owned by a community property trust established by the spouses shall reflect the share of the surviving spouse and the other one-half (1/2) shall reflect the share of the decedent. Unless provided otherwise in the trust agreement, the trustee shall have the power to distribute assets of the trust in divided or undivided interests and to adjust resulting differences in valuation. A distribution in kind may be made on the basis of a non-pro rata division of the aggregate value of the trust assets, on the basis of a pro rata division of each individual asset, or by using both methods.

Upon the dissolution of the marriage of the settlor spouses, the community property trust shall terminate, and the trustee shall distribute one-half (1/2) of the trust assets to each spouse, with each spouse receiving one-half (1/2) of each asset, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by both spouses.

HISTORY:

2020 ch. 25, § 3, effective July 15, 2020.